Louisiana, session 2026, HB351.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 15:827.1(E) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 351 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session Fontenot
Abstract: Repeals the entrepreneurial educational curriculum relative to the reentry
preparation program.
Present law provides for a reentry program that provides entrepreneurial education for
eligible offenders to learn business concepts, marketing, development, and negotiation skills.
Proposed law repeals the entrepreneurial educational curriculum as it relates to the reentry
preparation program.
(Repeals R.S. 15:827.1(E))
Page 1 of 1